District of Columbia statutes.
38-2674

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply as of April 1, 2013.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4035, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4035 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
Section 4031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of 2013”.